Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-111
Departments; officers; bond or insurance required.

Each head of a department shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201, which bond or policy shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Laws 1919, c. 190, § 10, p. 438;

C.S.1922, § 7251;

C.S.1929, § 81-113;

R.S.1943, § 81-111;

Laws 1947, c. 16, § 5, p. 101;

Laws 1967, c. 36, § 6, p. 163;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 30;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 39.

For bond, see section 11-102 and Chapter 11, article 2.

Head of department herein referred to represents exactly the same head of executive department referred to in the Constitution. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).